Utah statutes.
63M-7-405.   Compensation of members -- Reports to the Legislature, the courts, and the governor.

(1)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(2)  The commission shall submit to the Legislature, the courts, and to the governor at least 60 days prior to the annual general session of the Legislature its reports and recommendations for sentencing guidelines and amendments.  It is intended that the commission utilize existing data and resources from state criminal justice agencies.  The commission is authorized to employ professional assistance and other staff members as it considers necessary or desirable.

(3)  The commission shall be responsive to all three branches of government, but be part of the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice for coordination on criminal and juvenile justice issues, budget, and administrative support.

